Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-498
Tax previously paid; credit allowed; when.

If such tax has been paid upon any of the ingredients or compounds under the provisions of section 66-489, credit shall be allowed for such tax previously paid, in computing the tax upon such compound, so that the motor fuels used in the compound are not taxed twice.

Laws 1925, c. 172, § 6, p. 451;

C.S.1929, § 66-406;

R.S.1943, § 66-415;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-415;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 17.